nl: Type stroomsnelheid: Snel; Medium; Langzaam; Variabel; Andere
lt-LT: Srauto greičio tipas: Greitas; Vidutiniškas; Lėtas; Kintamas; Kita
ro-RO: Tip debit: Rapid; Prăjire medie; Lent; Variabil; Altele
ko: 유량 유형: 빠름; 매체; 느림; 가변; 기타
sv: Typ av flödeshastighet: Snabb; Medium; Långsam; Variabel; Övrigt
de: Typ der Durchflussrate: Schnell; Medium; Langsam; Variabel; Sonstiges
cs: Rychlost průtoku: Rychlé; Médium; Pomalé; Proměnlivá; Jiné
zh-TW: 流量類型: 快速; 媒介; 慢速; 可變; 其他
it: Tipo di portata: Veloce; Medium; Lento; Variabile; Altro
tr: Akış hızı tipi: Hızlı; Orta; Yavaş; Değişken; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип дебит: Бърз; Среден; Бавен; Променлив; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta protoka: Brzo; Srednje; Sporo; Varijabilni; Ostalo
nb: Type strømningshastighet: Rask; Middels; Langsom; Variabel; Annet
fr: Type de débit: Rapide; Moyen; Lent; Variable; Autre
ja: 流量のレベル: 高速; 媒体; 遅い; 可変; その他
th: ประเภทอัตราการไหล: เร็ว; สื่อ; ช้า; ปรับได้; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ natężenia przepływu: Szybki; Środek; Powolne; Zmienny; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta pretoka: Hitra; Srednja; Počasi; Spremenljivka; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ prietoku: Rýchly; Stredný; Pomalý; Variabilný; Iné
da: Strømningshastighedstype: Hurtig; Medium; Langsom; Variabel; Andet
vi: Loại tốc độ dòng chảy: Nhanh; Vừa; Chậm; Thay đổi; Khác
zh-CN: 流速类型: 快; 媒介; 慢; 可变; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de fluxo: Rápido; Médio; Lento; Variável; Outro
fi: Virtausnopeustyyppi: Nopea; Keskimääräinen; Hidas; Muuttuva; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de taxa de fluxo: Rápido; Médio; Lento; Variável; Outro
ru: Тип потока: Быстрый; Средний; Медленный; Переменный; Другой
hu: Áramlási sebesség típusa: Gyors; Közepes; Lassú; Változó; Egyéb
es: Tipo de tasa de flujo: Rápido; Medio; Lento; Variable; Otros
en: Flow rate type: Fast; Medium; Slow; Variable; Other
el: Τύπος ταχύτητας ροής: Γρήγορη; Μέση; Αργό; Μεταβλητή; Άλλο